Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.480

Violations—As gross misdemeanors—Statute of limitations.

(1) Any person who willfully fails to register an offering of camping resort contracts under this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) It is a gross misdemeanor for any person in connection with the offer or sale of any camping resort contracts willfully and knowingly:

(a) To make any untrue or misleading statement of a material fact, or to omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading;

(b) To employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud;

(c) To engage in any act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person;

(d) To file, or cause to be filed, with the director any document which contains any untrue or misleading information;

(e) To breach any impound, escrow, trust, or other security arrangement provided for by this chapter;

(f) To cause the breaching of any trust, escrow, impound, or other arrangement placed in a registration for compliance with RCW 19.105.336; or

(g) To employ unlicensed salespersons or permit salespersons or employees to make misrepresentations or violate this chapter.

(3) No indictment or information may be returned under this chapter more than five years after the date of the event alleged to have been a violation.

[ 2003 c 53 s 152; 1988 c 159 s 24; 1982 c 69 s 19.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.